Utah statutes.
62A-4a-114.   Financial reimbursement by parent or legal guardian.

(1)  The division shall seek reimbursement of funds it has expended on behalf of a child in the protective custody, temporary custody, or custody of the division, from the child's parents or legal guardians in accordance with an order for child support under Section 78A-6-1106.

(2)  A parent or any other obligated person is not responsible for support for periods of time that a child is removed upon a finding by the Juvenile Court that there were insufficient grounds for that removal and that child is returned to the home of the parent, parents, or legal guardians based upon that finding.

(3)  In the event that the Juvenile Court finds that there were insufficient grounds for the initial removal, but that the child is to remain in the custody of the state, the Juvenile Court shall order that the parents or any other obligated persons are responsible for support from the point at which it became improper to return the child to the home of his or her parent, parents, or legal guardians.

(4)  The attorney general shall represent the division in any legal action taken to enforce this section.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

